New York, session 2025-2026, S9782.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 413 of the social 2 services law, as amended by chapter 733 of the laws of 2023, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (a) The following persons and officials are required to report or 5 cause a report to be made in accordance with this title when they have 6 reasonable cause to suspect that a child coming before them in their 7 professional or official capacity is an abused or maltreated child, or 8 when they have reasonable cause to suspect that a child is an abused or 9 maltreated child where the parent, guardian, custodian or other person 10 legally responsible for such child comes before them in their profes- 11 sional or official capacity and states from personal knowledge facts, 12 conditions or circumstances which, if correct, would render the child an 13 abused or maltreated child: any physician; registered physician assist- 14 ant; surgeon; medical examiner; coroner; dentist; dental hygienist; 15 osteopath; optometrist; chiropractor; podiatrist; resident; intern; 16 athletic trainer; psychologist; registered nurse; social worker; emer- 17 gency medical technician; licensed creative arts therapist; licensed 18 marriage and family therapist; licensed mental health counselor; 19 licensed psychoanalyst; licensed behavior analyst; certified behavior 20 analyst assistant; hospital personnel engaged in the admission, examina- 21 tion, care or treatment of persons; a Christian Science practitioner; 22 school official, which includes but is not limited to school teacher, 23 school guidance counselor, school psychologist, school social worker, 24 school nurse, school administrator or other school personnel required to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04186-03-6 S. 9782 2 1 hold a teaching or administrative license or certificate; full or part- 2 time compensated school employee required to hold a temporary coaching 3 license or professional coaching certificate; social services worker; 4 employee of a publicly-funded emergency shelter for families with chil- 5 dren; director of a children's overnight camp, summer day camp or trav- 6 eling summer day camp, as such camps are defined in section thirteen 7 hundred ninety-two of the public health law; day care center worker; 8 school-age child care worker; provider of family or group family day 9 care; employee or volunteer in a residential care facility for children 10 that is licensed, certified or operated by the office of children and 11 family services; or any other child care or foster care worker; mental 12 health professional; substance abuse counselor; alcoholism counselor; 13 all persons credentialed by the office of alcoholism and substance abuse 14 services; employees, who are expected to have regular and substantial 15 contact with children, of a health home or health home care management 16 agency contracting with a health home as designated by the department of 17 health and authorized under section three hundred sixty-five-l of this 18 chapter or such employees who provide home and community based services 19 under a demonstration program pursuant to section eleven hundred fifteen 20 of the federal social security act who are expected to have regular and 21 substantial contact with children; peace officer; police officer; 22 district attorney or assistant district attorney; investigator employed 23 in the office of a district attorney; or other law enforcement official; 24 or any employee of a tier II facility or any other shelter providing 25 temporary housing to persons under the age of eighteen. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.